Utah statutes.
70A-2-608.   Revocation of acceptance in whole or in part.

(1)  The buyer may revoke his acceptance of a lot or commercial unit whose
nonconformity substantially impairs its value to him if he has accepted it
(a)  on the reasonable assumption that its nonconformity would be cured and it
has not been seasonably cured; or
(b)  without discovery of such nonconformity if his acceptance was reasonably
induced either by the difficulty of discovery before acceptance or by the
seller's assurances.
(2)  Revocation of acceptance must occur within a reasonable time after the
buyer discovers or should have discovered the ground for it and before any
substantial change in condition of the goods which is not caused by their own
defects. It is not effective until the buyer notifies the seller of it.
(3)  A buyer who so revokes has the same rights and duties with regard to the
goods involved as if he had rejected them.
